Mississippi, session 2026, SB2435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as a separate section within Chapter 7, Title 49, Mississippi Code of 1972: 49-7-  .  (1)  The commission shall control, regulate and manage the taking of all black bears. (2)  Residents and nonresidents shall be required to purchase the following to hunt or kill any black bear for any purpose: (a)  A hunting license; and (b)  A black bear harvest permit established in subsection (3) of this section. (3)  (a)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 hunting season, the commission shall establish a black bear harvest permit to hunt or kill black bears, and shall establish a reasonable fee for an annual black bear harvest permit, not to exceed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00). Such permit shall be valid from the date of its issuance to June 30 following its date. (b)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 hunting season, the commission shall issue a total of twenty (20) black bear harvest permits.  For each hunting season thereafter, the commission shall increase the total number of black bear harvest permits issued by ten percent (10%), rounded to the nearest whole number. (4)  Any person who violates this section shall be deemed guilty, upon conviction, of a Class I violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-141. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.